District of Columbia statutes.
38-2972.01

Funding the fiscal effect of subchapter I of this chapter.

(a)

The revenue to offset reductions to the General Fund of District of Columbia resulting from the deposit of revenue into the Fund shall be funded from the following sources, in the following order of priority, and shall not be allocated for any other uses or purposes until subchapter I of this chapter is fully funded:

(1)

The unallocated local revenues, from existing revenue sources, in the revised quarterly revenue estimates of the Chief Financial Officer, beginning September 2005, through May 2006, which are estimated by the Chief Financial Officer to be collected in fiscal years 2007, 2008, and 2009; provided, that such allocation shall be subject to the funding the fiscal effect of the following acts:

(A)

The New Columbia Community Land Trust 22nd and Channing Streets, N.E. Tax Exemption Emergency Act of 2005, effective December 22, 2005 (D.C. Act 16-243; 53 DCR 266);

(B)

The Self-Assessing Taxpayer Fairness in Notice Emergency Act of 2005, effective December 22, 2005 (D.C. Act 16-241; 53 DCR 262);

(C)

The Parkside Terrace Economic Development Act of 2006, (§ 4607) [D.C. Law 16-84, effective April 4, 2006];

(D)

The National Community Reinvestment Coalition Real Property Tax Exemption Act of 2005, ( 47-1071) (D.C. Act 16-222) [D.C. Law 16-60, effective March 8, 2006];

(E)

The February Revised Revenue Allocation Emergency Act of 2006, effective February 27, 2006 (D.C. Act 16-297);

(F)

The Triangle Community Garden Equitable Real Property Tax Exemption and Relief Emergency Act of 2006, effective March 23, 2006 (D.C. Act 16-330; 53 DCR 2589); and

(G)

The Far Southeast Community Organization Tax Exemption and Forgiveness for Accrued Taxes Emergency Act of 2006 [D.C. Act 16-372, effective May 19, 2006].(D.C. Act 16-372; 53 DCR 4384).

(2)

In fiscal year 2007, the unrestricted balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia, subject to any funds required pursuant to § 42-2802(c)(16), as certified pursuant to the annual audit, as of the end of fiscal year 2007.

(3)

Repealed.

(b)

The Mayor shall submit an annual budget which incorporates the allocations of revenues as provided in subsection (a) of this section. The Mayor shall incorporate such allocations in any supplemental budget submission.

History

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-123, § 141, 53 DCR 2843
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 1132(a), 53 DCR 6899
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 108(a), 56 DCR 1117

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-192, in subsec. (a)(1), substituted “beginning September 2005, through May 2006,” for “beginning September 2005,”; in subsec. (a)(2), substituted “In” for “Beginning for” and substituted “as of the end of fiscal year 2007” for “to be applied to the fiscal year 2 years following the audited fiscal year”; and repealed subsec. (a)(3), which had read as follows: “(3) The increase in deed recordation and transfer taxes as provided under §§ 42-1103(a-3) and 47-903(a-2).”
D.C. Law 17-353 validated previously made technical corrections in the section heading and subsec. (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1132(a) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1132(a) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1132(a) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).

Short Title

Short title: Section 1131 of D.C. Law 16-192 provided that subtitle L of title I of the act may be cited as the “School Modernization Financing Amendment Act of 2006”.

Editor's Notes

Section 401 of D.C. Law 16-123 provided: “Sec. 401. Sunset. If, pursuant to section 141(a)(1), there are unallocated local revenues, from existing revenue sources, sufficient to fund Title I, then section 141(a)(2) and (3), and section 161 shall sunset.”.